Kansas, session 2025-2026, HB2030.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Kansas:
Section 1. (a) Except as provided in subsection (b), the provisions
of K.S.A. 8-2414 through 8-2416, 8-2419, 8-2430, 8-2431, 8-2438, 8-
2439, 8-2445 and 8-2446, and amendments thereto, shall not apply to
dealers and manufacturers of trailers, as defined in K.S.A. 8-126, and
amendments thereto.
(b) The provisions of subsection (a) shall not apply to:
(1) Dealers and manufacturers of semitrailers or travel trailers, as
those terms are defined in K.S.A. 8-126, and amendments thereto; and
(2) a dealer in the sale or exchange of any other type of vehicle
other than trailers.
(c) The provisions of this section shall be a part of and
supplemental to the vehicle dealers and manufacturers licensing act.
Sec. 2. This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its
publication in the statute book.
I hereby certify that the above BILL originated in the HOUSE, and was
adopted by that body
HOUSE adopted
Conference Committee Report
Speaker of the House.
Chief Clerk of the House.
Passed the SENATE
as amended
SENATE adopted
Conference Committee Report
President of the Senate.
Secretary of the Senate.
APPROVED
Governor.